Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-2204
Articles of incorporation; certificate
of registration; filing.

(1) One or more individuals residing
within the State of Nebraska, each of whom is licensed or otherwise legally
authorized to render the same professional service, may, by filing articles
of incorporation and a certificate of registration with the Secretary of State,
organize and become a shareholder in a professional corporation. The articles
of incorporation shall conform to the requirements of section 21-220 and
the certificate of registration shall conform to the requirements of sections
21-2216 to 21-2218.

(2) In addition to the requirements of subsection (1) of this section,
the articles of incorporation shall contain a statement of the profession
to be practiced by the corporation.

Laws 1969, c. 121, § 4, p. 556;

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 209;

Laws 2004, LB 16, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB749, § 271.